es: Tipo de correa para cortadora de césped: V dentada; Plano; Hexagonal/Doble V; Serpentina/Poli V; Sincronización (dentada); V; Otros
nb: Beltetype for gressklipper: Tannhjulet V; Flat; Sekskantet/dobbel V; Serpentin/Poly V; Timing (tannhjul); V; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de cinta para corta-relva: V dentado; Liso; Hexagonal/V duplo; Serpentina/Poli V; Sincronização (engrenada); V; Outro
ko: 잔디 깎기 기계 벨트 유형: 코그드 V; 플랫; 육각형/더블 V; 서펜타인/폴리 V; 타이밍(코그드); V; 기타
ja: 芝刈り機ベルトの種類: 歯車付きV; フラット; 六角形/ダブルV; サーペンタイン/ポリV; タイミング（コグ）; V字型; その他
fr: Type de courroie de la tondeuse: V cranté; Plat; Hexagonal/Double V; Serpentine/Poly V; Synchronisation (à denture crantée); V; Autre
en: Lawn mower belt type: Cogged V; Flat; Hexagonal/Double V; Serpentine/Poly V; Timing (cogged); V; Other
de: Typ für Rasenmäher-Keilriemen: Keilriemen; Flach; Sechseckig/Doppel-V; Serpentinen-/Poly-V-Gewebe; Doppelzahnriemen; V; Sonstiges
sl-SI: Vrsta jermena za kosilnico: Zobčani V; Ploščata; Šesterokotni/dvojni V; Serpentin/Poli V; Časovni mehanizem (zobčani); V; Druga
nl: Type grasmaaierriem: Getande V-snaar; Vlak; Zeshoekig V-snaar/Dubbele V; Poly-V-snaar; Distributieriem (getand); V; Overig
zh-TW: 除草機皮帶類型: 鑲齒 V 形; 平皮帶; 六角形/雙面 V 形; 蛇形/多溝 V 形; 正時 (鑲齒); V 形; 其他
sk-SK: Typ hnacieho remeňa pre kosačku: Ozubený klinový remeň; Rovný; Šesťhranný/dvojitý klinový remeň; Serpentínový/Viacdrážkový; Rozvodový (ozubený); V; Iné
tr: Çim biçme makinesi kayış tipi: Dişli V; Düz; Altıgen/Çift V; Serpantin/Poli V; Zamanlama (dişli çark); V; Diğer
th: ประเภทของสายพานเครื่องตัดหญ้า: สายพานวีแบบมีร่องฟัน; เรียบ; สายพานหกเหลี่ยม/ดับเบิลวี; สายพานเซอร์เพนไทน์/โพลีวี; สายพานไทม์มิ่ง (มีร่องฟัน); V; อื่นๆ
vi: Loại dây curoa máy cắt cỏ: Dây đai chữ V có răng; Phẳng; Dây đai lục giác/chữ V kép; Dây đai nhiều rãnh; Dây đai cam (có răng); V; Khác
bg-BG: Тип ремък за косачка за трева: Зъбчато V–образно; Плоско; Шестоъгълни/двойни трапецовидни; Серпентинов/Poly V; Ангренажни (зъбен ремък); V; Друго
ro-RO: Tip de curea pentru mașina de tuns iarba: V zimțat; Plat; Hexagonală/V dublă; Serpentină/poli V; Temporizare (zimțată); V; Altele
zh-CN: 割草机带类型: 齿形 V 带; 扁平带; 六角/双 V 皮带; 蛇形/多楔带; 同步带（齿形）; V 型带; 其他
cs: Typ řemene pro sekačku na trávu: Ozubený klínový; Ploché; Šestihranný/dvouklínový; Víceklínový; Ozubené; Klínové; Jiné
ru: Тип ремня газонокосилки: Клиновой с поперечными зубьями; Плоский; Клиновой шестигранный двусторонний; Поликлиновой многоручьевой; Синхронный зубчатый; Клиновой; Другой
hr-HR: Vrsta remena za kosilicu: Nazubljeni V; Ravna; Šesterokut/Dvostruko V; Rebrasti / Poli V; Vremenski (zupčano); V; Ostalo
pt-BR: Tipo de cinto para cortador de grama: Perfil V dentado; Plano; Perfil V hexagonal/duplo; Perfil serpentina/Poly V; Sincronização (engrenada); V; Outro
sv: Typ av gräsklipparrem: Kuggad V; Platt; Sexkantig / Dubbel V; Serpentin / Poly V; Tidtagning (kuggad); V; Övrigt
el: Τύπος ιμάντα χλοοκοπτικού: Οδοντωτό V; Επίπεδος; Εξαγωνικό/Διπλό V; Σερπεντίνη/Πολυ V; Χρονισμός (οδοντωτός); Τύπος V; Άλλο
it: Tipo di cinghia per tagliaerba: V dentata; Piatto; Esagonale/Doppia V; Serpentina/Poli V; A tempo (dentata); V; Altro
lt-LT: Vejapjovės diržo tipas: Dantytas V; Plokščias; Šešiakampis / Dvigubas V; Serpentinas / Kelių V; Laikas (dantytas); V; Kita
pl: Typ paska do kosiarki: Pasek zębaty typu Cogged V; Płaskie; Pasek sześciokątny / podwójne V; Pasek wielorowkowy (serpentine / Poly V); Pasek rozrządu (zębaty); V; Pozostałe
da: Plæneklipperremtype: Fortandet V; Flad; Sekskantet/dobbelt V; Serpentin/poly V; Timing (tandhjul); V; Andet
fi: Ruohonleikkurin hihnatyyppi: Hammastettu V-hihna; Tasainen; Kuusikulmainen/kaksinkertainen V-hihna; Moniurainen V-hihna; Ajoitus (hammastettu); V-hihna; Muu
hu: Fűnyíró szíjtípus: Fogazott V; Lapos; Hatszögletű/dupla V; Hajtószíj/több-bordás; Időzítés (fogazott); V; Egyéb